Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3624.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. REPEALER 19 O.S. 2021, Section 36, is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
Passed the House of Representatives the 16th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ___ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

ENGR. H. B. NO. 3624 Page 1